Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-520.02
Action or proceeding, defined.

The term action or proceeding means all actions and proceedings in any court and any action or proceeding before the governing bodies of municipal corporations, public corporations, and political subdivisions for the equalization of special assessments or assessing the cost of any public improvement.

Laws 1957, c. 80, § 2, p. 326.

The act, of which this section is a part, is not amendatory, but is new and independent legislation. Farmers Co-op. Mercantile Co. v. Sidner, 175 Neb. 94, 120 N.W.2d 537 (1963).

Resolution of necessity for constructing a sewer system was not within purview of this section. Jones v. Village of Farnam, 174 Neb. 704, 119 N.W.2d 157 (1963).

Statute does not contemplate personal notice must be given to a class on matters of general public concern. Lindgren v. School Dist. of Bridgeport, 170 Neb. 279, 102 N.W.2d 599 (1960).